Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 8 Local Canvassing Authorities

17-8-1.
Appointment of bipartisan authority.

The legislative body of each city and town shall appoint a bipartisan canvassing authority of three (3) qualified electors of the city or town, not more than two (2) of whom shall belong to the same political party, and may appoint two (2) alternate members, not more than one of whom shall belong to the same political party. At any meeting of the canvassing authority at which a member is to be absent, the member may request that an alternate replace him or her for that meeting; provided, that the alternate member must be of the same political party as the member. The mayor or the president of the town council shall nominate the members of the canvassing authority from lists of party voters submitted by the respective chairpersons of the city or town political committee, which lists shall contain the names of five (5) times the number of persons to be appointed. If the legislative body refuses to approve the nomination of any person to the canvassing authority, the mayor or the president shall submit to the legislative body another person named on one of the lists, and so on until a person is appointed. If the chairperson of the city or town committee of a political party entitled to an appointment fails or refuses to submit a list, the mayor or the president shall nominate any party voter of the political party entitled to the appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3754, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-2

; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 151, § 1.

17-8-2.
Term and qualifications for office.

Each member of a local canvassing authority shall be appointed to serve for a term of six (6) years beginning on the first Monday of March succeeding the date of his or her appointment and until his or her successor is elected and qualified. No person shall be appointed or serve as a member of the authority who is an officer or employee of the United States or of this state, or who is an officer or employee of the authority’s city or town; provided, that in any city a member of the authority may be employed as its clerk. Any member of the authority who becomes a candidate for election to any public office and who fails to file a declination of the candidacy within the time allowed by law shall be disqualified from holding membership upon the authority and his or her successor shall be immediately elected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 18; G.L. 1956, § 17-8-15; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74; P.L. 2007, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 436, § 1.

17-8-3.
Compensation.

Each member of a local board shall receive any compensation that may be provided by the governing body of each city or town; provided, that in the several towns where no other provision is made for compensation, each member of the local board shall be paid by that member’s respective town five dollars ($5.00) per day for every day’s attendance in the discharge of the member’s respective duties, and the town clerks shall be paid, in addition, legal fees for making out and recording the several lists and returns required by this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 8, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 20; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 20; P.L. 1940, ch. 817, § 2; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 34; G.L. 1956, §§ 17-8-19, 17-8-21; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-8-4.
Oath of office of members.

Each person appointed as a member of a local board shall, before entering upon his or her duties, be sworn to the faithful performance of those duties, and a record of the oath shall be kept by the clerk of the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 18; G.L. 1956, § 17-8-16; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-8-5.
Local boards — Powers and duties — Quorum.

Each canvassing authority shall have and exercise the functions, powers, and duties provided for local boards by this title or by any law not inconsistent with this title. It shall:

Select one of its members as presiding officer and another as clerk of the board; provided, that nothing in this title shall be deemed to affect the powers and duties of the town clerk who shall be ex officio the clerk of the respective town canvassing authorities; and provided, further, that in the cities of Pawtucket, Central Falls, Newport, Woonsocket, Cranston, and Warwick, the clerk shall be designated at the time of his or her election or appointment;

Have and discharge all of the functions, powers, and duties of the town council concerning nominations, elections, registration of voters and canvassing rights, the preparing and correcting of voting lists, and other related matters, which powers are transferred to the local board;

Make or furnish all returns or other things required by law to be made or furnished to or by city clerks, boards of canvassers, and district clerks, relative to any matter within the purview of this title;

Appoint and employ all its necessary clerical and technical assistants and fix the compensation of each person appointed, within the limits of funds available to it pursuant to law; provided, that in the cities of Cranston and Woonsocket and the town of Coventry the employment and compensation shall be subject to the approval of the respective city or town councils.

A quorum of a local board for the purpose of receiving registrations shall be comprised of one member of the board, and for all other purposes a quorum shall be comprised of two (2) members.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 8, §§ 24, 26; P.L. 1908, ch. 1608, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, §§ 23, 26, 35; G.L., ch. 7, §§ 3, 9; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1422, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1962, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1975, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, §§ 3, 9; P.L. 1926, ch. 924, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 1085, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1804, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2192, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, §§ 3, 6, 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 25; P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, § 18; G.L. 1956, §§

17-8-5

,

17-8-6

,

17-8-10

, 17-8-12, 17-8-14, 17-8-17, 17-8-18; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 403, § 1.

17-8-6.
Fees in cities other than Cranston and Woonsocket.

The local boards in the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Newport, and Warwick shall not retain to their own use any of the fees now allowed by law to recording and certifying officers, but shall charge and collect the statutory fees for any record, certificate, or copy required by law to be made by the board, and shall pay over the fees on the first business day of every month to the city treasurer of the respective city; provided, that those boards shall furnish, as now required by law, certified copies of any list of qualified electors in any representative district, ward, or voting district in the city on payment of the sum of one dollar ($1.00) for each certified list, which sums shall also be paid into the city treasury of the cities as provided in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 363, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, § 7; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 8; G.L. 1956, § 17-8-11; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-8-7.
Power of boards to administer oaths and subpoena evidence — Self-incrimination — False swearing.

The members of the local boards are severally authorized to administer oaths, and the boards, in all cases of every nature pending before them, are authorized and empowered to summon witnesses by subpoena signed by the clerk of those boards, and to compel these witnesses to attend and testify in the same manner as witnesses are compelled to appear and testify in any court; and the boards are authorized to compel the production of all papers, books, documents, records, certificates, or other legal evidence that may be necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question or the discharge of any duty required by law of the boards, by issuing a subpoena duces tecum, signed by their clerk. Every person disobeying any subpoena shall be adjudged as in contempt, and the boards may punish any contempt of their authority in like manner as contempt may be punished by any court, and the boards may, at any meeting held for the purpose of canvassing the voting lists, examine under oath the person whose right to vote is disputed or any other person, and may receive any other evidence that the boards may deem necessary respecting the right of any person to have his or her name upon the registry or to vote, and shall decide upon the right. No evidence elicited in the examination shall be used against the person so examined in any criminal prosecution against him or her, except a prosecution for perjury in the examination. Any person who shall willfully swear falsely in any proceeding, matter, or hearing before the boards or any of them shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 363, § 4; C.P.A. 1905, § 1221; P.L. 1908, ch. 1608, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 8, §§ 32, 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 7, § 13; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 7, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 14; G.L. 1956, § 17-8-20; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 5.

17-8-8.
General penalty clause.

Every person who violates any provision of this chapter, unless another penalty is provided in this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 312, § 38; P.L. 1940, ch. 819, § 4; P.L. 1940, ch. 819, § 6; G.L. 1956, § 17-8-22; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 5; P.L. 1994, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 264, § 1.

17-8-9.
Local boards open on election day.

In addition to duties as otherwise fixed by law, it shall be the duty of the local board to keep open on all election days, from the hour fixed for the opening of the polls until the hour fixed for the closing of the polls, and to remain in session during the hours at a regular place of meeting of the board, council, or other body.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2192, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 24; impl. am. P.L. 1951 (s.s.), ch. 2870, §§ 8, 10; G.L. 1956, § 17-10-32; G.L. 1956, §

17-8-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-8-10.
Publication of local questions to be submitted to voters.

Prior to each local election at which public questions are to be submitted, the local board shall cause to be prominently posted in at least three (3) local public locations and advertised at least once in a newspaper of local circulation, or in lieu of the requirement to place the advertisement in a newspaper of local circulation, the City of Pawtucket may mail to the household of each registered voter prior to the election the full text of each legislative act to be acted upon and the election date, or the local board may substitute a description of the text of each act in lieu of the full text, together with the following information:

The designated number of the question;

A brief caption of the question;

A brief explanation of the measure that is the subject matter of the question; and

A notice that voter fraud is a felony and the penalty for voter fraud. This notice shall be in conspicuous lettering and shall contain the following language: “You must be registered to vote from your actual place of residence.”

If the public question involves the issuance of bonds or other evidence of indebtedness or any other long-term financial obligation such as a lease, the notice required by subsection (a) of this section shall also include at least the following information to be provided:

The estimated total cost of the project or program, including financing (using a reasonable assumed rate of interest), legal, and other costs.

The estimated useful life of the project, and the term of the bonds, other indebtedness, or other obligation.

A reasonably detailed description of the project or program, its purposes, and a project timetable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 220, § 1.